District of Columbia statutes.
32-207

Work or vacation permit — Procurement by employer.

No minor under 18 years of age shall be employed, permitted, or suffered to work in, about, or in connection with any gainful occupation, except in agricultural work or housework as specified in § 32-201, unless the employer procures and keeps on file and accessible to any attendance officer, inspector or other person authorized to enforce this subchapter a work or vacation permit issued as hereinafter prescribed, except that minors under 18 years of age may be employed without a permit outside of school hours in irregular or casual work usual to the home of the employer; provided, that such employment shall not be in connection with nor form a part of the business, trade, profession, or occupation of the employer; and provided further, that such employment shall not be specifically prohibited by any provision of this subchapter or by any order issued under the authority of § 32-203.

May 29, 1928, 45 Stat. 1000, ch. 908, § 8
renumbered as § 7 and amended June 15, 1976, D.C. Law 1-68, § 2(9), 23 DCR 516
This section is referenced in § 32-201.
1981 Ed., § 36-507.
1973 Ed., § 36-208.